Hawaii statutes.
§329-34 Revocation and suspension of
registration. (a) A registration under section 329-33 to manufacture,
distribute, dispense, or conduct reverse distribution with a controlled
substance may be suspended or revoked by the department of public safety upon a
finding that the registrant:

(1) Has furnished false or fraudulent material
information in any application filed under this chapter;

(2) Has been convicted of a felony or has been
granted a motion for the deferral of acceptance of a guilty plea or a nolo
contendere plea to a felony, pursuant to chapter 853 and under any state or
federal law relating to any controlled substance;

(3) Has had the registrant's federal registration
suspended or revoked to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, dispense, or
conduct reverse distribution with controlled substances; or

(4) Has had the registrant's state license to
practice the registrant's profession suspended or revoked by the applicable
governing state board.

(b) The department of public safety may limit revocation
or suspension of a registration to the particular controlled substance with
respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension exist.

(c) If the department of public safety
suspends or revokes a registration, all controlled substances owned or
possessed by the registrant at the time of suspension or the effective date of
the revocation order may be placed under seal. No disposition may be made of
substances under seal until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until
all appeals have been concluded unless a court, upon application therefor,
orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of the
sale with the court. Upon a revocation order becoming final, all controlled
substances may be forfeited to the State.

(d) The department of public safety shall
promptly notify the Bureau of all orders suspending or revoking registration
and all forfeitures of controlled substances. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L
1980, c 147, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 214, §4; am L 1990, c 281, §10; am L
2016, c 218, §9]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next